Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.240

Employment contracts.

The board of directors of each second-class school district shall adopt a written policy governing procedures for the letting of any employment contract authorized under RCW 42.23.030. This policy shall include provisions to ensure fairness and the appearance of fairness in all matters pertaining to employment contracts so authorized.

[ 1989 c 263 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.60.360.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 263: See note following RCW 42.23.030.